Alaska, session 34, SB186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 47.25.990(2) is amended to read: 05 (2) "food" means any food or food product for human consumption 06 except alcoholic beverages, soft drinks, and tobacco and includes seeds and plants for 07 use in gardens to produce food for the personal consumption of the eligible household; 08 * Sec. 2. AS 47.25.990 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 09 (5) "soft drink" means a nonalcoholic beverage containing natural or 10 artificial sweeteners; "soft drink" does not include beverages that contain milk, milk 11 products, soy, rice, or other milk substitutes, or greater than 50 percent vegetable or 12 fruit juice by volume. 13 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 14 read: 01 WAIVER. The Department of Health shall, as necessary for federal approval, submit a 02 request to the food and nutrition service of the United States Department of Agriculture for 03 any waiver necessary to implement secs. 1 and 2 of this Act. 04 * Sec. 4. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 05 read: 06 CONDITIONAL EFFECT; NOTIFICATION. (a) Sections 1 and 2 of this Act take 07 effect only if, on or before July 1, 2027, the United States Department of Agriculture 08 (1) approves the waiver to the state program submitted in accordance with sec. 09 3 of this Act; or 10 (2) determines that approval of the waiver to the state program submitted in 11 accordance with sec. 3 of this Act is not necessary. 12 (b) The commissioner of health shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing within 30 13 days after the United States Department of Agriculture approves the waiver to the state 14 program or determines that approval of the waiver is not necessary under this section. 15 * Sec. 5. If secs. 1 and 2 of this Act take effect, they take effect on the day after the date the 16 United States Department of Agriculture approves the waiver to the state program or 17 determines that approval of the waiver is not necessary. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.